Massachusetts, session 194th, H2275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. The city of Revere may pay an amount not to exceed $31,400 to Denise
Mattera (Condelli). School Committeeman Anthony Mattera passed away while serving as a
member of the school committee. This amount represents the salary to which he would have
been entitled if he had lived and served until the end of his term of office.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1